Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.090

State noxious weed list—Selection of weeds for control by county board.

(1) Each county noxious weed control board shall, within ninety days of the adoption of the state noxious weed list from the state noxious weed control board and following a hearing, select those weeds from the class C list and those weeds from the class B list not designated for control in the noxious weed control region in which the county lies that it finds necessary to be controlled in the county.

(2) The weeds thus selected and all class A weeds and those class B weeds that have been designated for control in the noxious weed control region in which the county lies shall be classified within that county as noxious weeds, and those weeds comprise the county noxious weed list.

(3) Nothing in this chapter limits a county noxious weed control board, or other branch of county or city government, from conducting education, outreach, or other assistance regarding plant species not included on the state noxious weed list if the county or city determines that the plant species causes localized risk or concern.

[ 2011 c 126 s 2; 1997 c 353 s 11; 1987 c 438 s 9; 1969 ex.s. c 113 s 9.]